Utah statutes.
19-6-405.7.   Petroleum Storage Tank Cleanup Fund -- Revenue and purposes.

(1)  There is created a private-purpose trust fund entitled the "Petroleum Storage Tank Cleanup Fund," which is referred to in this section as the cleanup fund.

(2)  The cleanup fund sources of revenue are:

(a)  any voluntary contributions received by the department for the cleanup of facilities;

(b)  legislative appropriations made to the cleanup fund; and

(c)  costs recovered under this part.

(3)  The cleanup fund shall earn interest, which shall be deposited in the cleanup fund.

(4)  The director may use the cleanup fund money for administration, investigation, abatement action, and preparing and implementing a corrective action plan regarding releases not covered by the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund created in Section 19-6-409.

